Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-703
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the 24/7 Sobriety Program Act:

(1) 24/7 sobriety program means a program that, as a condition of bail as ordered by a court, requires an individual who was arrested to:

(a) Totally abstain from alcohol and drugs for a specified period of time;

(b) Be subject to at least twice daily testing for alcohol according to best practice standards; and

(c) Be subject to drug testing if indicated by best practices;

(2) Department means the Department of Motor Vehicles;

(3) Director means the Director of Motor Vehicles; and

(4) Testing means a method to determine the presence of alcohol or drugs.

Laws 2021, LB271, § 3.
July 1, 2022